Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5072.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 5.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,480,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,480,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,480,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 5.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,480,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,480,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,480,000 (2) ATTORNEY GENERAL OPERATIONS Sexual assault law enforcement--FTEs 5.0 $ 1,480,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,480,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,480,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $1,480,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for sexual assault law enforcement must be used by the department to test backlogged sexual assault kits across this state. Funding must be used for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 only 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To eliminate all county sexual assault kit backlogs across this state. (b) To assist local prosecutors with investigations and prosecutions of viable sexual assault cases. (c) To provide victim services. (2) Not later than February 1, the department shall submit a report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The number of sexual assault kits across this state that remain untested as of September 30, 2025. (b) A detailed work plan that outlines the department's action plan to eliminate all outstanding sexual assault kits and the time frame for completion of testing of all untested sexual assault kits. (c) A detailed work and spending plan that outlines anticipated litigation action and expenditures resulting from findings of the sexual assault kit testing. (3) Any funds remaining after the department has met the obligations required under subsection (1) may be used for the purpose of retesting any previously tested sexual assault kits across this state using currently available DNA testing. Funds may be used under this subsection only for DNA testing on previously tested kits that were not tested for DNA. If there are remaining untested sexual assault kits on September 30, 2025, funds must be used only for the testing of those kits.